Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Health Care Certificate of Need Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 71-5803.01 to 71-5803.15 shall be used.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 3;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 244, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 59;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 4.